New York, session 2025-2026, S2529.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 article 12-E to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 12-E 4 BICYCLE AND ELECTRIC SCOOTER SAFETY EDUCATION COURSE AND LICENSE 5 Section 399-u. Bicycle and electric scooter operator's safety manual. 6 399-v. License for the operation of a bicycle, bicycle with 7 electric assist and electric scooter. 8 399-w. Rules and regulations. 9 § 399-u. Bicycle and electric scooter operator's safety manual. The 10 commissioner shall develop and publish a bicycle and electric scooter 11 operator's safety manual that shall be available for distribution and 12 accessible on the department's website. The manual shall include but 13 not be limited to the following: 14 (a) an overview of traffic laws governing bicycles, bicycles with 15 electric assist and electric scooters; 16 (b) the safe operation of bicycles, bicycles with electric assist and 17 electric scooters; 18 (c) bicycle lanes as defined in section one hundred two-a of this 19 chapter; and 20 (d) obligations to comply with traffic control devices and markings 21 related to bicyclists, electric scooter operators and pedestrians. 22 § 399-v. License for the operation of a bicycle, bicycle with electric 23 assist and electric scooter. 1. Upon successful comprehension of the 24 bicycle and electric scooter operator's safety manual, a resident may 25 then make an application to receive a license for the operation of a 26 bicycle, bicycle with electric assist and electric scooter. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01946-01-5 S. 2529 2 1 2. (a) An application for such license shall be made to the commis- 2 sioner and shall require an applicant to furnish proof of identity, age, 3 fitness and any other information required by the commissioner. Such 4 application may also require a photographic image of the applicant. 5 (b) A nominal fee may be prescribed by the commissioner for the issu- 6 ance, renewal and amendment of a license. 7 (c) A license shall be valid from the date of issuance until a date of 8 expiration as determined by the commissioner. 9 § 399-w. Rules and regulations. The commissioner shall promulgate such 10 rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of 11 this article. In addition to any requirements expressly authorized by 12 this article, such regulations may include but not be limited to vali- 13 dating that a person has read and comprehends the department's bicycle 14 and electric scooter operator's safety manual. 15 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 504 of the vehicle and traffic law is 16 amended by adding a new paragraph (a-2) to read as follows: 17 (a-2) Every license or renewal thereof issued to an applicant who has 18 a license for the operation of a bicycle, bicycle with electric assist 19 and electric scooter and after submission of proof as set forth in this 20 paragraph shall contain a distinguishing mark, in such form as the 21 commissioner shall determine, indicating that such applicant has read 22 and comprehends the bicycle and electric scooter operator's safety manu- 23 al. Such proof shall consist of a license for the operation of a bicy- 24 cle, bicycle with electric assist and electric scooter that is provided 25 pursuant to section three hundred ninety-nine-v of this chapter. The 26 commissioner shall not require fees for the issuance of such licenses or 27 renewals thereof containing a bicycle and electric scooter operator's 28 safety manual comprehension distinguishing mark which are different from 29 fees otherwise required; provided, however, that notwithstanding the 30 provisions of this section, the commissioner shall not require fees for 31 a duplication or amendment of a license prior to its renewal if such 32 duplication or amendment was solely for the purpose of adding a bicycle 33 and electric scooter operator's safety manual comprehension distinguish- 34 ing mark to such license. 35 § 3. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new section 36 1244 to read as follows: 37 § 1244. Operation of a bicycle or bicycle with electric assist is 38 prohibited without a license. No person shall operate a bicycle or bicy- 39 cle with electric assist on a public roadway in a city with a population 40 of one million or more unless the operator is a holder of a license for 41 the operation of a bicycle, bicycle with electric assist and electric 42 scooter issued to such operator pursuant to article twelve-E of this 43 chapter. 44 § 4. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new section 45 1290 to read as follows: 46 § 1290. Operation of an electric scooter is prohibited without a 47 license. No person shall operate an electric scooter on a public roadway 48 in a city with a population of one million or more unless the operator 49 is a holder of a license for the operation of a bicycle, bicycle with 50 electric assist and electric scooter issued to such operator pursuant to 51 article twelve-E of this chapter. 52 § 5. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 53 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 54 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 55 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 56 completed on or before such date.